Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2447
Health care facility; use of automated medication system or automated pickup kiosk; policies and procedures required.

Any health care facility authorized to use an automated medication system or an automated pickup kiosk shall develop, maintain, and comply with policies and procedures developed in consultation with the pharmacist responsible for pharmacist care for that facility. At a minimum, the policies and procedures shall address:

(1) The description and location within or at the facility of the automated medication system or automated pickup kiosk or the equipment being used;

(2) The name of the pharmacist responsible for implementation of, and compliance with, policies and procedures;

(3) Medication access and information access procedures;

(4) Security of inventory and confidentiality of records in compliance with state and federal laws, rules, and regulations;

(5) A description of the process used by a pharmacist or pharmacy technician for filling an automated medication system or an automated pickup kiosk;

(6) A description of how, and by whom, the automated medication system or automated pickup kiosk is being utilized, including processes for verifying, dispensing, and distributing medications;

(7) Staff education and training;

(8) Quality assurance and quality improvement programs and processes;

(9) Inoperability or emergency downtime procedures;

(10) Periodic system maintenance; and

(11) Medication security and controls.

Laws 2008, LB308, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 76;

Laws 2013, LB326, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB912, § 32.
May 1, 2027